Utah statutes.
53-3-810.   Prohibited uses of identification card -- Penalties.

(1)  It is a class C misdemeanor to:

(a)  lend or knowingly permit the use of an identification card issued to the person, by a person not entitled to it;

(b)  display or to represent as the person's own an identification card not issued to the person;

(c)  refuse to surrender to the division or a peace officer upon demand any identification card issued by the division;

(d)  use a false name or give a false address in any application for an identification card or any renewal or duplicate of the identification card, or to knowingly make a false statement, or to knowingly conceal a material fact in the application;

(e)  display a revoked identification card as a valid identification card;

(f)  knowingly acquire, use, display, or transfer an item that purports to be an authentic identification card issued by a governmental entity if the item is not an authentic identification card issued by that governmental entity; or

(g)  alter any information contained on an authentic identification card so that it no longer represents the information originally displayed.

(2)  It is a class A misdemeanor to knowingly:

(a) issue an identification card with false or fraudulent information;

(b) issue an identification card to any person younger than 21 years of age if the identification card is not distinguished as required for a person younger than 21 years of age under Section 53-3-806; or

(c) acquire, use, display, or transfer a false or altered identification card to procure:

(i)  a cigarette;

(ii)  an electronic cigarette, as defined in Section 76-10-101;

(iii)  tobacco; or

(iv)  a tobacco product.

(3)  A person may not knowingly use, display, or transfer a false or altered identification card to procure alcoholic beverages, gain admittance to a place where alcoholic beverages are sold or consumed, or obtain employment that may not be obtained by a minor in violation of Section 32B-1-403.

(4)  It is a third degree felony if a person's acquisition, use, display, or transfer of a false or altered identification card:

(a)  aids or furthers the person's efforts to fraudulently obtain goods or services; or

(b)  aids or furthers the person's efforts to commit a violent felony.

